Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3085.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5870XC (4) 91 dg/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554J.1 Definitions. 1 1. âBiometric dataâ means any information about or based on 2 an individualâs biometric identifier. 3 2. a. âBiometric identifierâ means an individualâs retina, 4 iris, fingerprint, voice, hand, facial geometry, or other 5 physical feature that is described by all of the following: 6 (1) The feature is inherently tied to a specific individual. 7 (2) The feature is considered permanent, difficult to 8 replicate, and remains relatively stable over time. 9 (3) The feature is unique enough to identify a person with a 10 high degree of accuracy. 11 b. âBiometric identifierâ does not include any of the 12 following: 13 (1) Writing samples, written signatures, and similar 14 products. 15 (2) Photographs. 16 (3) Biological samples used for scientific testing or 17 screening. 18 (4) Demographic data. 19 (5) Physical descriptions including but not limited to 20 tattoo descriptions, height, weight, eye color, and hair color. 21 (6) Information gained from an individualâs health care 22 treatment, including but not limited to biological samples 23 taken from an individual. 24 (7) A biometric scan, mammography, X ray, roentgen process, 25 computed tomography, magnetic resonance imaging, positron 26 emission tomography scan, or other image or film of the human 27 anatomy used to diagnose, prognose, or treat an illness or 28 medical condition, or used for scientific testing or screening. 29 3. âDepartmentâ means the department of inspections, 30 appeals, and licensing. 31 4. âPrivate entityâ means any nongovernmental entity or 32 group. 33 5. âSubjectâ means an individual to whom particular 34 biometric data pertains. 35 -1- LSB 5870XC (4) 91 dg/jh 1/ 6 S.F. _____ Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 554J.2 Biometric data. 1 1. a. A private entity in possession of biometric data 2 shall develop a written policy to establish a schedule for how 3 long the private entity will retain biometric data before the 4 private entity destroys the biometric data. 5 b. A written policy shall be available to the public. 6 c. A private entity shall not retain biometric data for more 7 than three years after the subject of the biometric data last 8 interacts with the private entity or until the purposes for 9 which the biometric data was collected have been accomplished, 10 whichever is longer. 11 2. A private entity shall not collect, capture, purchase, or 12 otherwise obtain an individualâs biometric data unless, prior 13 to receiving the biometric data, the private entity does all 14 of the following: 15 a. Informs the subject of the biometric data, or the 16 subjectâs legal representative, in writing, that the private 17 entity intends to collect the subjectâs biometric data. 18 b. Informs the subject of the biometric data, or the 19 subjectâs legal representative, in writing, of the purposes and 20 length of time for which the private entity intends to retain 21 the biometric data. 22 3. A private entity shall not sell, lease, trade, or 23 otherwise profit from an individualâs biometric data. 24 4. A private entity shall store, transmit, and protect 25 biometric data using reasonable methods that are widely 26 accepted within the private entityâs industry and are 27 equivalent to, or more protective than, the manner in which the 28 private entity protects passwords and other information that 29 can be used to provide access to an individualâs account or 30 property. 31 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 554J.3 Limitations. 32 This chapter shall not apply to an employer that uses an 33 employeeâs biometric data solely within the scope of the 34 employeeâs employment. 35 -2- LSB 5870XC (4) 91 dg/jh 2/ 6 S.F. _____ Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 554J.4 Enforcement ââ penalties ââ 1 rules. 2 1. The department shall enforce this chapter and may seek 3 injunctive relief for a violation of this chapter. 4 2. The department shall establish electronic means for an 5 individual to report a violation of this chapter. 6 3. If a private entity in violation of this chapter has not 7 previously violated this chapter, the department shall send 8 notice to the private entity informing the private entity of 9 the violation and allowing the private entity thirty calendar 10 days to cure the violation. 11 4. A private entity that violates this chapter is subject to 12 the following civil penalties: 13 a. One thousand dollars for a first violation. 14 b. Five thousand dollars for a second violation, regardless 15 of whether the private entity cured a first violation within 16 the time allowed under subsection 3. 17 c. Ten thousand dollars for a third or subsequent violation. 18 5. Civil penalties collected under this section shall be 19 deposited into the general fund of the state. 20 6. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 21 to implement and enforce this chapter. 22 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 554J.5 Interpretation. 23 1. This chapter shall not be construed to affect the 24 admission or discovery of biometric data in a court action or 25 in an administrative action under chapter 17A. 26 2. This chapter shall not be construed to affect a 27 contractor, subcontractor, or agent of a government entity 28 while the contractor, subcontractor, or agent is acting in the 29 capacity for which the government entity employed or contracted 30 the contractor, subcontractor, or agent. 31 3. This chapter shall not be construed to create a private 32 right of action. 33